Arkansas, session 2025, HB1975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:


SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 88, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 15 — Child Content Creation Protection Act

4-88-1501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Child Content
Creation Protection Act".

4-88-1502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Content creator" means a parent or legal guardian
residing in the State of Arkansas who creates static image or video content
that is performed in the State of Arkansas in exchange for compensation and
includes without limitation a:
(i) Vlogger;
(ii) Podcaster;
(iii) Social media influencer; and
*LJH282*
04-09-2025 11:07:05 LJH282

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1975
(iv) Streamer.
(B) "Content creator" does not include a minor who
produces his or her own content;
(2) "Minor" means a person seventeen (17) years of age or
younger who resides in the State of Arkansas;
(3) "Personal identifying information" means information that
allows a person to uniquely identify another person based on factors that
include without limitation the person's image, voice, name, or contact
information;
(4) "Social graph" means the list of people that an account
holder is connected to using a friending function or similar functionality on
a social media platform, not including the act of subscribing to content from
another account holder;
(5) "Social media platform" means a public or semipublic
internet-based service or application that has account holders in the State
of Arkansas and with respect to account holders:
(A) Connects account holders to allow them to interact
socially with other account holders within the service or application;
(B) Permits public posting of account holder-generated
content without accessibility being limited to a particular social graph; and
(C) Permits interaction with other account holders'
content outside of a limited social graph, including without limitation
content recommended from persons that the account holder does not follow; and
(6) "Uniquely identifiable" means an individual, other than an
individual submitting a privacy removal request, who could identify the
individual submitting the privacy removal request separately from other
individuals based on personal identifying information.

4-88-1503. Compensation for content creation featuring minor — Records
— Trust account required — Right to civil action.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a minor is engaging
in the work of content creation if he or she meets the following criteria
during the previous twelve (12) month period:
(1)(A) At least thirty percent (30%) of a content creator's
compensated content produced within one (1) thirty-day day period includes
the likeness, name, or photograph of the minor.
04-09-2025 11:07:05 LJH282

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1975
(B) Content percentage in subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
section is measured by the percentage of time that the likeness, name, or
photograph of the minor is visible or is the subject of an oral narrative in
content as compared to the total length of the content segment;
(2) The number of views received per content segment on a social
media platform met the social media platform's threshold for the generation
of compensation or the content creator received actual compensation for
content equal to or greater than ten cents ($0.10) per view; and
(3) The content creator received actual compensation for content
of at least fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) in the previous twelve-month
month period.
(b) A minor who is thirteen (13) years of age or older may produce,
create, and publish his or her own content and is entitled to all
compensation for his or her own content creation.
(c)(1) A content creator whose content features a minor engaged in the
work of content creation as described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall maintain the following records until the minor reaches twenty-one (21)
years of age:
(A) The name and documentary proof of the age of the minor
engaged in the work of content creation as of the date that the content
creator begins creating content;
(B) The number of posts that generated compensation during
the reporting period;
(C) The total number of minutes of the posts that the
content creator received compensation for during the reporting period;
(D) The total number of minutes that each minor was
featured in posts during the reporting period;
(E) The total compensation generated from posts featuring
a minor during the reporting period; and
(F) The amount deposited into the trust account for the
benefit of the minor engaged in the work of content creation as required by
subdivision (d)(1)(B) of this section.
(2)(A)(i) The records required to be maintained under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be readily accessible to the minor
for his or her review.
(ii) The content creator shall provide notice to the
04-09-2025 11:07:05 LJH282

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1975
minor of the existence of the records under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section.
(B)(i) If a content creator whose content features a minor
engaged in the work of content creation fails to maintain the records
required under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the minor may commence a
civil action to enforce the provisions of this subsection.
(ii) If a minor prevails in an action brought under
subdivision (c)(2)(B)(i) of this section, the court may award:
(a) Injunctive relief;
(b) Actual damages;
(c) Punitive damages; and
(d) The cost of the action, including without
limitation attorney's fees and litigation costs.
(d)(1) A content creator shall:
(A) Compensate a minor who engages in the work of content
creation under this section;
(B) Set aside gross earnings on the content created by a
minor engaging in the work of content creation under this section, including
without limitation the likeness, name, or photograph of the minor, in a trust
account; and
(C) Preserve the trust account under subdivision (d)(1)(B)
of this section for the benefit of the minor until the minor reaches eighteen
(18) years of age according to the distribution under subdivision (d)(2) of
this section.
(2)(A) When only one (1) minor engaged in the work of content
creation meets the content threshold described in subdivision (a)(1)(A) of
this section, the percentage of total gross earnings on any content segment,
including the likeness, name, or photograph of a minor, that is equal to or
greater than one-half (1/2) of the content percentage that includes the minor
as described under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall be paid into
the minor's trust account under this subsection.
(B) When more than one (1) minor engaged in the work of
content creation meets the content threshold described in subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section, the percentage of total gross earnings on any
content segment, including the likeness, name, or photograph of a minor, that
is equal to or greater than one-half (1/2) of the content percentage that
04-09-2025 11:07:05 LJH282

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1975
includes the minor as described under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section
shall be divided equally between each of the minors, regardless of any
difference in the percentage of content provided by the individual minors,
and paid into a separate trust account for each minor under this subsection.
(3)(A) A trust account under this subsection shall provide, at a
minimum, that:
(i) The funds in the trust account be available only
to the minor engaged in the work of content creation;
(ii) The trust account shall be held by a bank or
trust company, as those terms are defined under § 23-51-102;
(iii) The funds in the trust account shall become
available to the minor engaged in the work of content creation when the minor
reaches eighteen (18) years of age, or upon entry of an order of emancipation
of the minor by a court of competent jurisdiction; and
(iv) The trust account meets the requirements under
the Arkansas Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, § 9-26-201 et seq.
(B)(i) If a content creator knowingly or recklessly
violates subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this section, the minor may commence an
action to enforce the provisions of this subsection.
(ii) If a minor prevails in an action brought under
subdivision (c)(2)(B)(i) of this section, the court may award:
(a) Injunctive relief;
(b) Actual damages;
(c) Punitive damages; and
(d) The cost of the action, including without
limitation attorney's fees and litigation costs.
(e) This section does not:
(1) Affect a right or remedy available under any other law of
this state; or
(2) Have any effect on a party that is neither the content
creator nor the minor engaged in the work of content creation.

4-88-1503. Privacy removal requests.
(a) A social media platform shall provide an easily accessible
mechanism through which a minor who is featured in a content creator's
content or an adult who was featured in a content creator's content as a
04-09-2025 11:07:05 LJH282

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1975
minor on or after the effective date of this subchapter may submit a request
for the content creator to:
(1) Delete the content from the social media platform; or
(2) Edit the content to remove the minor's or adult who was
featured as a minor's private information if the minor or the adult who was
featured as a minor is uniquely identifiable.
(b) A removal request submitted to a social media platform under this
section shall include all information reasonably requested by the online
platform to identify the minor or adult who was featured as a minor and the
relevant content.
(c)(1) A social media platform shall notify the content creator
responsible for the content of the content creator's obligation to remove the
content within a reasonable time period not to exceed thirty (30) days.
(2) A content creator who receives notice under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section shall:
(A) Delete the relevant content from the social media
platform; or
(E) Edit the relevant content to remove the minor's or
adult who was featured as a minor's uniquely identifiable information no
later than seventy-two (72) hours after receipt of the notification.
(3) If the content creator responsible for the content fails to
take action after a reasonable time period not to exceed thirty (30) days
under this subsection:
(A)(i) The minor or adult who was featured as a minor may
commence an action to enforce this subsection.
(ii) If a minor prevails in an action brought under
subdivision (c)(3)(A)(i) of this section, the court may award:
(a) Injunctive relief;
(b) Actual damages;
(c) Punitive damages; and
(d) The cost of the action, including without
limitation attorney's fees and litigation costs; and
(B) The social media platform shall review and take all
reasonable steps to remove the content from the online platform unless:
(i) The minor or adult who was featured in the
content creator's content as a minor does not submit sufficient, accurate
04-09-2025 11:07:05 LJH282

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1975
information; or
(ii) The social media platform finds that the
content is sufficiently newsworthy or of other public interest to outweigh
the privacy interests of the minor or adult who was featured in the content
creator's content as a minor.
(d) This section does not affect a right or remedy available under any
other law of this state.

4-88-1504. Intentional sexualization of a minor — Exception.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, it
shall be unlawful to financially benefit from knowingly producing or
distributing publicly, including without limitation by computer, any visual
depiction of a minor with the intent to sexually gratify or elicit a sexual
response in the viewer or any other person.
(2) This section:
(A) Does not prohibit any lawfully authorized
investigative, protective or intelligence activity of:
(i) A law enforcement agency of this state;
(ii) A political subdivision of this state;
(iii) A law enforcement agency of the United States;
or
(iv) An intelligence agency of the United States;
(B) Shall not apply:
(i) In the case of an individual acting in good
faith to report unlawful activity or in pursuance of a legal, professional,
or other lawful obligation;
(ii) In the case of a document production or filing
associated with a legal proceeding; and
(iii) To a social media platform regarding content
provided by creators unless the social media platform intentionally solicits,
or knowingly and predominantly distributes, the content; and
(C) Shall not impose liability in a manner that is
inconsistent with 47 U.S.C. § 230, as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(b)(1) If a person violates this section or attempts or conspires to
violate this section, the minor may commence an action to enforce the
provisions of this section.
04-09-2025 11:07:05 LJH282

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1975
(2) If a minor prevails in an action brought under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section, the court may award:
(A) Injunctive relief;
(B) Actual damages;
(C) Punitive damages; and
(D) The cost of the action including without limitation
attorney's fees and litigation costs.
(c) This section does not affect a right or remedy available under any
other law of this state.
(d)(1) A social media platform shall develop and implement a risk-
based strategy to help mitigate risks related to monetization of the
intentional sexualization of known minors that occurs in the context of known
minors' engagement in the work of content creation.
(2) The strategy under subdivision (d)(1) of this section:
(A) Shall be documented and reassessed on a reasonably
recurring basis; and
(B) May include at the sole discretion of the social media
platform commercially reasonable:
(i) Policies that govern content and related
monetization;
(ii) Restrictions of features on content featuring
minors;
(iii) Use of an automated system to identify and
enforce against potentially problematic content and accounts;
(iv) Inclusion of precautions to mitigate against
recommendation systems surfacing content of interest to offenders; and
(v) Quality assurance processes recurring at
reasonable intervals to ensure that the social media platform's mitigation
procedures under this subsection are working as intended.
(e)(1) A social media platform shall ensure that information about its
content policies, settings, and best practices for content featuring minors
are publicly available, understandable to both adults and minors, and
informed by research and outside expertise.
(2) The information under subdivision (e)(1) of this section
shall:
(A) Inform content creators that they may be subject to
04-09-2025 11:07:05 LJH282

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1975
various legal requirements under the laws of this state; and
(B) Explain risks and steps to protect minors appearing in
posts from exploitation.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date.
This act shall be effective on July 1, 2026.

/s/Gramlich




























04-09-2025 11:07:05 LJH282